FR941027-1-00030 FR941027-1-00011 Thursday October 27, 1994 Part III Department of Health and Human Services Food and Drug Administration 21 CFR Part 20, et al. Adverse Experience Reporting Requirements for Human Drug and Licensed Biological Products; Proposed Rule Federal Register ␣/␣Vol. 59, No. 207␣/␣Thursday, October 27, 1994␣/␣Proposed Rules DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Food and Drug Administration 21 CFR Parts 20, 310, 312, 314, and 600 [Docket No. 93N&hyph;0181] Adverse Experience Reporting Requirements for Human Drug and Licensed Biological Products AGENCY: Food and Drug Administration, HHS. ACTION: Proposed rule. SUMMARY: The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is proposing to amend its current adverse experience reporting regulations for human drug products and for licensed biological products to provide consistency with the elements of FDA Form 3500A and require the use of this new reporting form; revise certain definitions and reporting periods and formats as recommended by the International Conference on Harmonization of Technical Requirements for Registration of Pharmaceuticals for Human Use (ICH) and the World Health Organization's Council for International Organizations of Medical Sciences (CIOMS); require applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors to develop written procedures for monitoring and reporting adverse experiences; state that reports of adverse experiences that are forwarded by FDA to the applicant or manufacturer, packer, and distributor should not be resubmitted to the agency; and make other revisions to the regulations to provide uniformity in adverse experience reporting for human drug products and licensed biological products. These changes would simplify and facilitate the reporting of adverse experiences and would enhance agencywide consistency in the collection of postmarketing adverse experience data. In addition, FDA is proposing to amend the requirements for clinical study design and conduct and the sponsor reporting requirements in the investigational new drug application (IND) regulations. These amendments are intended to provide more complete and accurate information that would enable sponsors, investigators, and FDA to determine serious toxicities of investigational drugs more expeditiously during clinical studies. DATES: Submit written comments by January 25, 1995. The agency proposes that any final rule that may issue based on this proposal become effective 30 days after its date of publication in the Federal Register . ADDRESSES: Submit written comments to the Dockets Management Branch (HFA&hyph;305), Food and Drug Administration, rm. 1&hyph;23, 12420 Parklawn Dr., Rockville, MD 20857. FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: Concerning human drug products: Howard P. Muller, Center for Drug Evaluation and Research (HFD&hyph;362), Food and Drug Administration, 7500 Standish Pl., Rockville, MD 20855, 301&hyph;594&hyph;1049. Concerning licensed biological products: Paula S. McKeever, Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research (HFM&hyph;635), Food and Drug Administration, 1401 Rockville Pike, suite 200N, Rockville, MD 20852&hyph;1448, 301&hyph;594&hyph;3074. SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: I. Background In the Federal Register of June 3, 1993 (58 FR 31596), FDA announced the availability of a new form for reporting adverse events and product problems with medications, devices, and other FDA-regulated medical products. This form is available in two versions. One version of the form (FDA Form 3500) is to be used by health professionals for voluntary reporting; the other version of the form (FDA Form 3500A) is to be used by applicants or manufacturers (including licensed manufacturers of licensed biological products), and other persons subject to mandatory reporting requirements under FDA regulations. Under existing regulations, drug manufacturers, packers, and distributors and applicants for new drug products and generic drug products must report adverse events under §§310.305 and 314.80 (21 CFR 310.305 and 314.80). Elsewhere in this issue of the Federal Register , FDA is issuing a final rule establishing new §600.80. This section makes licensed manufacturers of biological products subject to certain reporting requirements. The new form is part of FDA's Medical Products Reporting Program (MedWatch) and is designed to encourage and facilitate the reporting of adverse events and product problems for most FDA-regulated human medical products by the entire health care community, including manufacturers, distributors, user facilities, and health professionals. FDA issued the new form to simplify and consolidate the reporting of suspected adverse events and product problems with human drug products, biologics, and medical devices, as well as the reporting of adverse events with other FDA-regulated medical products, such as dietary supplements. FDA has found that, under the current system, there is some confusion about what to report to the agency and that the existing assortment of reporting forms and systems can interfere with the efficient reporting of suspected problems. FDA has attempted to clarify and simplify adverse event reporting with the new form by eliminating redundant or nonessential elements and by clarifying those areas that have caused confusion. FDA Form 3500A replaces current Form FDA&hyph;1639, as well as most other adverse event and product problem reporting forms currently required by the agency. Adverse events associated with vaccines will continue to be reported through the FDA and Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Vaccine Adverse Event Reporting System (VAERS). FDA is proposing to amend the adverse experience reporting requirements for human drug products and for licensed biological products to be consistent with the elements of FDA Form 3500A. In developing FDA Forms 3500 and 3500A, the agency considered several recommendations from ICH and CIOMS. These organizations were formed to facilitate international consideration of issues, particularly safety issues, concerning the use of both foreign and domestic data in the development and use of drugs and biological products. ICH has worked to promote the harmonization of technical requirements for the registration of pharmaceutical products among three regions: The European Union, Japan, and the United States. ICH has prepared a draft guideline specific to parts of this issue entitled: ``Clinical Safety Data Management: Definitions and Standards for Expedited Reporting.'' In the Federal Register of July 9, 1993 (58 FR 37408), FDA published this draft guideline for public comment. Several CIOMS working groups have worked to coordinate and standardize the international reporting of postmarketing adverse drug reactions by pharmaceutical manufacturers to regulatory authorities. CIOMS Working Group II has proposed an international system of standardized time intervals, formats, and inclusion criteria in order to lessen confusion and reduce preparation time among manufacturers and to enable them to report postmarketing adverse experiences more rapidly, efficiently, and effectively (Refs. 1 and 2). FDA believes that many changes recommended by CIOMS and ICH would result in more effective reporting of serious adverse experiences to regulatory authorities worldwide. FDA is proposing to amend the adverse experience reporting requirements for human drug products and licensed biological products in part to be consistent with certain standardized definitions, procedures, and formats proposed by these international organizations. FDA is also proposing to amend the requirements for clinical study design and conduct and the sponsor reporting requirements in the IND regulations. These amendments are intended to provide more complete and accurate information that would enable sponsors, investigators, and FDA to determine serious toxicities of investigational drugs more expeditiously during clinical studies. A clinical study of fialuridine (FIAU) resulted in several instances of severe liver and pancreatic injury and five deaths, beginning in June 1993. This incident prompted FDA to establish a task force to see whether the data available before the study gave any suggestion of the serious toxicity that emerged, and whether some differences in process or behavior by investigators and sponsors might have made it possible or more likely for them to have anticipated the toxicity in the 1993 study. The proposed IND amendments contained in this document are largely the result of recommendations by this task force. II. Description of the Proposed Rule A. Replacement of Form FDA&hyph;1639 and How to Obtain Copies of FDA Form 3500A FDA's existing regulations at 21 CFR 20.112, 310.305, and 314.80 refer to Form FDA&hyph;1639. The agency is proposing to amend these regulations to replace references to Form FDA&hyph;1639 with new FDA Form 3500A. This change is necessary because new FDA Form 3500A replaces Form FDA&hyph;1639 (58 FR 31596). The existing regulations at §§310.305(d)(4) and 314.80(f)(4)) also provide an address where a person may obtain copies of Form FDA&hyph;1639. FDA is proposing to amend these regulations to state where a person can obtain copies of FDA Form 3500A. Ten or fewer copies of FDA Form 3500A and a copy of the instructions for completing the form can be obtained from the Division of Epidemiology and Surveillance (HFD&hyph;730), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. Large numbers of copies (greater than 10 copies) may be obtained by writing to the Consolidated Forms and Publications Distribution Center, Washington Commerce Center, 3222 Hubbard Rd., Landover, MD 20785. B. Definitions of ``Data Lock-Point'' and ``International Birth Date'' FDA is proposing to amend §§314.80(a) and 600.80(a) to define the terms ``data lock-point'' and ``international birth date.'' The ``data lock-point'' is the end of the reporting period (cutoff date) for data to be incorporated into a specific postmarketing adverse experience periodic report. On this date, the data available to the reporter are held for review and evaluation by the applicant or licensed manufacturer prior to being submitted to FDA. The international birth date is the date that the first regulatory authority in the world approved the human drug or biological product for marketing. As explained further in section II.E. of this document, each 6-month anniversary of the international birth date is the data lock-point for data to be incorporated into a specific postmarketing adverse experience periodic report. The proposed rule would define these terms because they describe the standardized international reporting period developed by CIOMS for submitting postmarketing adverse experience reports. CIOMS developed this standardized reporting period to lessen confusion and to enable applicants and licensed manufacturers to prepare and submit similar reports of adverse experiences to regulatory authorities. It would also reduce preparation time among applicants and licensed manufacturers because it eliminates varying due dates presently required for submitting postmarketing adverse experience reports to regulatory authorities worldwide. FDA believes the CIOMS reporting schedule, which decreases reporting rates currently required by FDA for drug and licensed biological products for the first 3 years of marketing from every 3 months to every 6 months and increases it thereafter from every 12 months to every 6 months, permits adequate time for reporters to make periodic submissions to regulatory authorities. In addition, the agency believes that the proposed reporting frequency is sufficient to notify FDA of potential postmarketing safety problems that do not require expedited reporting. C. Definition of ``Serious'' FDA's existing adverse experience reporting regulations (21 CFR 310.305(b)(4), 312.32(a), 314.80(a), and 600.80(a)) define a serious adverse experience as one that is ``fatal or life-threatening, is permanently disabling, requires inpatient hospitalization, or is a congenital anomaly, cancer, or overdose.'' Consistent with new FDA Form 3500A and with recommendations by the ICH and CIOMS, the proposed rule would amend this definition to read as follows: Serious means an adverse drug experience occurring at any dose that is fatal or life-threatening, results in persistent or significant disability/incapacity, requires or prolongs inpatient hospitalization, necessitates medical or surgical intervention to preclude permanent impairment of a body function or permanent damage to a body structure, or is a congenital anomaly. The agency is proposing to remove ``cancer'' from the definition because cancer would most often be reported under the other broader elements in the definition. For example, cancer may be reported as life-threatening or requiring inpatient hospitalization. Other diseases or conditions that may be life-threatening or require hospitalization, such as heart disease or myocardial infarction, have not been identified as separate elements in previous definitions, and the agency believes it is not necessary to single out cancer. The proposed amendment would also remove ``overdose'' from the definition of serious. Reports of overdoses that had serious outcomes would still be reported under the other broader elements in the definition. Reports of overdoses that did not lead to outcomes defined as serious would provide the agency with less critical safety information. By adding the phrase ``occurring at any dose'' after ``adverse drug experience'' in the definition, the agency will ensure that a serious adverse experience at any dose, whether it is the labeled dose or a different dose, including an overdose or an underdose, should be reported. FDA is also proposing to clarify the phrase ``is permanently disabling'' by substituting ``results in persistent or significant disability/incapacity.'' This change is intended to clarify that a disability need not be permanent to be considered a serious adverse experience. The proposed amendments would also modify the phrase ``requires inpatient hospitalization'' to read ``requires or prolongs inpatient hospitalization.'' This change is intended to cover those situations where a serious adverse experience occurs while the patient is already hospitalized, and the adverse experience prolongs the patient's hospital stay. FDA is also proposing to add the phrase ``necessitates medical or surgical intervention to preclude permanent impairment of a body function or permanent damage to a body structure.'' The agency believes such events should be considered serious adverse experiences and should be reported. This change is also consistent with ICH's proposed definition of a serious adverse event. FDA notes that a serious adverse experience would not include the discontinuation of therapy, changes in dosage, or routine treatment with a prescription medication. D. Definitions of ``Disability'' and ``Life-Threatening'' The proposed rule would amend §§310.305(b), 314.80(a), and 600.80(a) to define the terms ``disability'' and ``life-threatening.'' These terms further explain what constitutes a serious adverse experience. ``Disability'' means a substantial disruption of one's ability to carry out normal life functions. ``Life-threatening'' means that the patient was, in the view of the initial reporter, at immediate risk of death from the adverse experience as it occurred. It does not include an adverse experience that, had it occurred in a more serious form, might have caused death. For example, product-induced hepatitis that resolved without evidence of hepatic failure would not be considered life-threatening even though hepatitis of a more severe nature can be fatal. Similarly, an allergic reaction resulting in angioedema of the face would not be life-threatening, even though angioedema of the larynx, allergic bronchospasm, or anaphylaxis can be fatal. FDA believes these definitions will help enable reporters to determine when a serious adverse experience occurs. E. Periodic Adverse Experience Reports Current regulations (§§314.80(c)(2)(i) and 600.80(c)(2)(i)) require the submission of periodic postmarketing reports at quarterly intervals for 3 years from the date of approval of the application, and then annually. Quarterly reports must be submitted within 30 days of the close of the quarter (the first quarter beginning on the date of U.S. approval of the application); each annual report must be submitted within 60 days of the date of U.S. approval of the application. FDA is proposing to revise this schedule by requiring the submission of periodic postmarketing adverse reaction reports every 6 months. The first 6-month anniversary of the international birth date after the application is approved in the United States is the data lock-point for the first periodic reporting term. Each subsequent 6-month anniversary of the international birth date is the data lock-point for subsequent periodic reporting terms for that particular product. The proposed rule would require periodic reports to be submitted to FDA within 45 days after the data lock-point. For example, a product approved by FDA, or licensed, if a biological product, on June 15, with an international birth date of April 1, would have its first data lock-point on October 1, which is less than 6 months after FDA approval, but which is the 6-month anniversary of the international birth date. Therefore, the first periodic report would be for the period of June 15 to October 1 and would be due at FDA by November 14. The second periodic report would cover October 2 to April 1 and would be due to the agency no later than May 15. The proposed rule would create the same reporting schedule based on the international birth date and data lock-point for licensed biological product distribution reports under §600.80(c)(3). This new reporting schedule is consistent with the standardized international reporting period proposed by the CIOMS II Working Group. This working group has recommended that all international regulatory authorities accept the same reporting schedule in order to lessen confusion and reduce preparation time by manufacturers, rather than the current system of varying due dates. FDA believes the CIOMS reporting schedule, which decreases reporting rates currently required by FDA for drug and licensed biological products for the first 3 years of marketing from every 3 months to every 6 months and increases reporting rates thereafter from every 12 months to every 6 months, permits adequate time for reporters to make nonexpedited submissions to regulatory authorities. In addition, FDA believes that the proposed reporting frequency is sufficient to alert the agency to potential postmarketing safety problems that are not within the categories requiring 15-day ``Alert reports.'' Applicants and licensed manufacturers who wish to submit periodic postmarketing adverse experience reports at different intervals could, under proposed §§314.80(c)(2)(i) and 600.80(c)(2)(i), submit a request for a waiver under 21 CFR 314.90 or 600.90 to alter the reporting intervals for these periodic reports. Proposed §§314.80(c)(2)(i) and 600.80(c)(2)(i) would also amend the reporting requirements for periodic postmarketing adverse experience reports to state that, in cases where the applicant or licensed manufacturer has received no reports of adverse experiences during a reporting period, the applicant or licensed manufacturer should submit a copy of the current approved labeling and a letter to the agency in place of a periodic postmarketing adverse experience report. The letter should identify the product, the application number, and the reporting period, and state that no adverse experience reports were received during that reporting period. Sections 314.80(c)(2)(ii) and 600.80(c)(2)(ii) set forth the contents currently required for a periodic report: (1) A narrative summary and analysis of the information in the report and an analysis of the 15-day postmarketing Alert reports submitted during the reporting interval; (2) a report describing each adverse experience not previously reported; and (3) a history of actions taken since the last periodic report. FDA is proposing to amend these regulations to provide a more extensive list of contents for a periodic postmarketing adverse experience report, as follows: 1. Title Page, Table of Contents, and Introduction This section would provide a summary of the periodic report with page references to detailed data and information. 2. Applicant's Core Safety Data Sheet The applicant's core safety data sheet would be a document prepared by the applicant that contains all relevant safety information, including adverse drug experiences, which the applicant believes should be listed for the drug in all countries where the drug is marketed. It may be used by the applicant as the reference document by which an adverse drug experience is judged to be expected or unexpected for purposes of this postmarketing periodic report. For all other determinations of whether an adverse drug experience is expected or unexpected, the definition in §§314.80(a) or 600.80(a) would apply. FDA recognizes that the postmarketing periodic report may be submitted by the applicant to multiple countries and the product may have different approved labels in the different countries. The use of the applicant's core safety data sheet as the reference document for determining whether an adverse drug experience is expected or not may result in some overreporting of unexpected adverse events that actually are expected by the U.S. approved product label. This is because the approved label for the United States may have more safety information included in it than the manufacturer's core safety data sheet. An applicant may also use the approved U.S. label as the reference by which expected and unexpected adverse drug experiences are determined for the postmarketing periodic report. If an applicant chooses to use the approved U.S. label for this purpose, it must clearly be stated in this section of the report. In all instances, if an adverse event is not listed in the U.S. label, but is in the manufacturer's core safety data sheet, this shall be clearly noted in the ``Overall safety evaluation'' (see section II.E.8. of this document). This section would also highlight clearly any changes and the reasons for the changes in the applicant's core safety data sheet since the previous postmarketing periodic report. 3. The Product's Marketing Status This section would contain, in tabular form, a chronological history of the marketing status of the product worldwide (all regulatory and marketing decisions affecting the product) from the date it was first approved through its current status. Approvals or applications voluntarily withdrawn for safety reasons would have to be included. The product would be listed by chemical (U.S. Adopted Names, international nonproprietary names, or proper name in accordance with ``Chemical Abstracts Nomenclature Standards'') and brand name(s). 4. Regulatory Actions for Safety Reasons This section would identify in narrative form the reasons for significant regulatory authority or manufacturer-initiated actions taken anywhere in the world, or to be taken imminently, for safety reasons during the reporting period. This would include, for example, application withdrawal or license suspension or failure to renew, distribution restrictions, clinical trial suspension, labeling changes due to significant safety concerns, dosage modifications, or pharmaceutical changes. 5. Patient Exposure This section would include the product's domestic and foreign marketing distribution data during the reporting period. This information would be used to calculate the extent of patient exposure. The method used by the manufacturer to estimate patient exposure would always be described and would include the total number of dosage units of each dosage form and strength or potency (e.g., 100,000/5-milligram tablets, 50,000/10-milliliter vials). 6. Individual Case Histories These reports would be presented in line listing format with the following 10 columns: country, source, age, gender, dose, duration of treatment (prior to event), time to onset, description of reaction (as reported), outcome (e.g., fatal, resolved), other comments (e.g., manufacturer's report number). This format is consistent with that suggested by CIOMS. In addition, a tabular summary of the number of adverse events by body system may be included. The individual case reports would consist of adverse drug experiences that are: (a) Serious, unexpected reports from published or unpublished clinical studies where it has been concluded that there is a reasonable possibility that the drug or licensed biological product caused the adverse experience; (b) serious, expected or unexpected spontaneous adverse drug experience reports and nonserious, unexpected spontaneous adverse experience reports received directly by the applicant or licensed manufacturer from the initial reporter or received by the applicant or licensed manufacturer from a drug regulatory authority, both U.S. or foreign; and (c) serious, expected or unexpected individual published case histories and nonserious, unexpected individual published case histories. This section would end with an analysis by the reporter, in narrative form, of the cases submitted. The applicant or licensed manufacturer would also attach to the end of the postmarketing periodic report a completed FDA Form 3500A for all U.S. spontaneous reports of adverse experiences except those not to be included in the periodic report as specified in proposed §§314.80(c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) and 600.80(c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii), or those sent by FDA to the applicant or licensed manufacturer. 7. Safety Studies This section would analyze and discuss fully and critically all toxicological, clinical, and epidemiological studies containing important safety information. 8. Overall Safety Evaluation This section would provide critical analysis of the safety information provided in the periodic report as it pertains to serious unexpected reactions, increased frequencies of known toxicity, reactions listed in the manufacturer's core safety data sheet but not included in the U.S. label, drug or licensed biological product interactions, overdose, drug or licensed biological product abuse, experiences during pregnancy or lactation, chronic treatment, pediatric or geriatric treatment, and new safety issues. For each of these areas, any absence of significant information would be reported. The evaluation would indicate whether the safety profile of the product remains consistent with cumulative experience to date and with the previous manufacturer's core safety data sheet. The evaluation would specify any action recommended and the reasons for such recommendations. 9. Other Information This section would consist of important information received after the data lock-point. It may include significant new cases or followup data that affect the interpretation or evaluation of existing reports. 10. FDA Form 3500A This section would consist of a completed FDA Form 3500A for each spontaneous U.S. adverse drug experience not reported under paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) in §§314.80 and 600.80. 11. Location of Adverse Experience Records This section would identify the current address(es), including street, city, State, and zip code, where all adverse experience reports and records are maintained. This revised list of contents for periodic postmarketing adverse experience reports is generally consistent with the international system of standardized postmarketing periodic reporting procedures and formats proposed by the CIOMS II Working Group. This standardization would allow applicants and licensed manufacturers to prepare a single postmarketing periodic report of adverse experiences for regulatory authorities worldwide. The agency also believes that the proposed rule would improve reporting and would enhance FDA's ability to monitor potential postmarketing safety problems. As a result of this proposed revised list of contents for periodic postmarketing adverse experience reports, FDA is proposing to remove §§314.80(c)(2)(iii) and 600.80(c)(2)(iii). These sections state that periodic reporting does not apply to information obtained from postmarketing studies, reports in the scientific literature, and foreign marketing experience. The proposed revised list of contents would include such information. F. IND Amendments FDA regulations governing the use of investigational drugs in clinical investigations are contained in part 312 (21 CFR part 312). In order to conduct a clinical investigation using an investigational drug, a sponsor must first submit an IND, described in §312.23, which contains, among other things, a description of the drug, the results of preclinical studies intended to show that the drug can be introduced into humans with reasonable safety, and a proposed protocol for the investigation. This protocol provides a description of all aspects of the study, including the identity and qualifications of the investigators conducting the study, procedures and criteria for selecting subjects, the amount of the drug to be administered, the duration of use, the observations to be made to assess the effects of the drug, and the clinical procedures, laboratory tests, and other measures carried out to minimize risk to the patient. After the IND becomes effective and the investigational drug is being administered to human subjects, the sponsor is required under §312.32 to make both telephone and written safety reports on serious and unexpected adverse experiences associated with the administration of the drug, as well as written reports only, on other serious adverse events associated with administration of the drug. Under current §312.33, the sponsor is also required to submit an annual report containing significant safety and other information. If FDA concludes that a study would place subjects at unreasonable and significant risk, FDA may place a study on clinical hold. This means that the drug may not be administered to subjects until the hold is lifted (see §312.42). FDA may also terminate the study under §312.44 based on such safety concerns. FDA is concerned that these IND reporting requirements may not be adequate to protect against some unexpected adverse events. For example, there is a potential for such events to be disguised by patient conditions that might lead the investigator to conclude that the experimental drug was not implicated in those events. The agency believes that certain modifications in the way clinical investigations are conducted and reported may help to ensure that drug toxicity is detected as early as possible. A recent internal task force that examined an incident that involved a fatal drug toxicity that was not detected in early trials has recommended improvements in IND reporting that the agency is incorporating into this proposal for public consideration. These improvements, as explained below, are intended to provide more frequent and more complete evaluations of potentially serious adverse effects so that drug-related events can be detected earlier by sponsors, investigators, and FDA. A clinical study of a nucleoside analog, FIAU, resulted in several instances of severe liver injury and five deaths, beginning in June 1993. The study involved 15 subjects with chronic hepatitis B virus infection. FIAU had been considered a highly promising agent without recognized serious toxicity. This incident prompted FDA to establish a task force to see whether the data available prior to the study gave any suggestion of the serious toxicity that emerged. The task force examined data from the 1993 FIAU study as well as data from previous studies on FIAU and a closely related drug conducted by another sponsor. The data from these previous studies was, or should have been, available to the sponsor of the 1993 FIAU study. The task force was also to determine whether some differences in process or behavior by investigators and sponsors might have made it possible or more likely to have anticipated the toxicity. The proposed IND amendments contained in this document are largely the result of recommendations by the task force (Ref. 3). Focusing on hepatic and pancreatic adverse events, the task force reviewed the data and data analyses that were available to investigators, sponsors, and FDA at the start of the study to determine whether improvements in the rules governing design, analysis, and reporting of data from clinical studies were warranted. The task force found a number of observations and events that suggested an association between FIAU and hepatic and/or pancreatic abnormalities. However, none of these events was attributed by the sponsors or investigators to FIAU. Rather, each event, even when recognized as temporally related to a study, was attributed by investigators and sponsors to other factors, such as concomitant drug administration and/or concurrent illness. The task force found that an overview of the data, in which deaths and serious adverse experiences were analyzed cumulatively, and, with the hypothesis that the events were drug related, was not produced and thus was not available for use by the sponsors, the principal investigators, or FDA reviewers. Rather, the analyses performed focused on each individual event and determined a plausible explanation, other than drug toxicity, for each occurrence. The task force recommended that, to detect similar patterns of events reflecting toxicity in future studies, sponsors should conduct cumulative analyses with a systematic consideration of the possibility that the adverse events are caused by the investigational drug. The proposed IND amendments would apply to all investigational studies conducted under part 312. However, FDA invites comments from the public and industry on whether any or all of the proposed requirements should apply only to certain IND's, whose selection could be determined by application of criteria that could be included in these regulations, or only to certain phases of drug testing. 1. Clinical Study Design FDA is proposing to amend the requirements governing IND format and content in §312.23. Under current §312.23(a)(6), an IND must contain the protocols for each planned study, including information such as a statement of the study's objectives and purpose, the criteria for patient selection and exclusion, a description of the study design, the method for determining the dose(s) to be administered and the duration of individual patient exposure to the drug, and a description of clinical procedures, laboratory tests, or other measures to be taken to monitor the effects of the drug in human subjects and to minimize risk. In several instances, FDA's FIAU task force found that deaths and serious hepatic and pancreatic injuries that appear in retrospect to have been related to FIAU were attributed by investigators and sponsors to the subjects' underlying disease or to other drugs the subjects were taking for their conditions. The task force made several recommendations intended to improve the likelihood that clinical studies will identify, early in drug development, drug toxicity that mimics the underlying disease or the toxicity of concomitant medications. These recommendations include: (1) Choosing study designs and safety endpoints that increase a study's ability to distinguish drug toxicity from underlying disease or other drug toxicity; (2) prospectively identifying observations that will trigger certain actions by investigators; and (3) summarizing safety data at regular intervals with systematic considerations of the possibility that adverse events are drug related. The proposed rule would create new §312.23(a)(6)(iii)(h) to require that the protocols describe any adverse clinical or laboratory outcomes in the study that are to be immediately reported to the sponsor. These reportable events might include death, any life-threatening event, or any other serious event that might reflect potential drug toxicity, as suggested by preclinical data, and include abnormal laboratory results falling outside of a specified range. The identified events and abnormal laboratory values are to include those that focus attention on toxicity that may target the same organs and body systems as the underlying disease or concomitant medications. Under the proposal, these events would be reported to the sponsor even if they are potentially attributable to the patient's underlying disease or concomitant medications. Proposed §312.23(a)(6)(iii)(h) would also require instructions for investigators, such as reporting requirements, remeasurement or challenge procedures, or discontinuation of the drug in response to identified events. The task force also recommended that sponsors consider the use of a control group (for example, placebo, active control, or historical control) in studies that focus on safety when the underlying disease process is likely to produce adverse events that might be confused with drug toxicity. The task force concluded that such controls would help detect some adverse events. Consequently, proposed §312.23(a)(6)(iii)( i ) states that sponsors should consider the use of a formal control group when the underlying disease is likely to produce adverse events that might be confused with drug toxicity. The task force also recommended that sponsors attempt to estimate the expected incidence of death and serious adverse events in the study population that arise from the underlying disease or concomitant medications used to treat the disease. This recommendation is reflected in proposed new §312.23(a)(6)(iii)( j ) that would require sponsors to provide such estimates. Under the proposal, any deaths or adverse events that exceed the estimates would create the presumption that the events are associated with use of the investigational drug, and the sponsor would be required to submit a written safety report to FDA. The task force found that the followup periods in some of the FIAU and related studies were too short to detect some of the adverse events that occurred because significant adverse events sometimes occurred weeks to months after dosing with FIAU ended. The task force recommended that all protocols contained in the IND include an explicit description of the length and type of followup to be performed so that the agency may review the followup procedures (task force report at 57). Accordingly, FDA is proposing to add new §312.23(a)(6)(iii)(k) to require that the protocol section of an IND specify and justify the length and type of followup for subjects after the conclusion of dosing. The justification may be brief; for example, a reference to a study of a similar drug with the same followup period. The followup period would ensure that clinical studies are adequately designed to detect drug toxicity that occurs after the conclusion of drug dosing. The sponsor would propose an appropriate followup period based on preclinical data, experience with other members of the drug class, the drug's mechanism of action, and prior human experience. The intensity of the followup may change with time; e.g., a full evaluation might be scheduled for 2 weeks postdosing, with a telephone followup for possible serious events at a later time. Ordinarily, in Phase 1 and 2 studies, telephone followup should occur at 3 months after the dosing is completed, but alternative timeframes and procedures can be proposed by the sponsor. For some drugs, like FIAU, a review of available data may suggest that the minimum followup period should be longer than 3 months. Current regulations in §312.56 require sponsors to review and evaluate the evidence relating to a drug's safety and effectiveness as it is obtained from investigators. The regulations also require sponsors to report safety information to FDA. The task force observed that in the FIAU study sponsors may not have had available adequate resources to evaluate safety data reported by investigators. The proposed rule would amend §312.56(c) to require sponsors, in addition to reviewing and evaluating safety and effectiveness information, to develop a safety monitoring and evaluation program before starting clinical trials. This provision is intended to ensure that sponsors have or will develop adequate resources to evaluate safety data reported by investigators and is consistent with the task force's recommendations (see task force report at 57). Consistent with this proposed requirement, FDA is also proposing in new §312.23(a)(3)(v) that an IND contain a description of any safety monitoring and evaluation program. This description would be in addition to the introductory statement and general investigational plan that are required under current regulations. 2. Safety Reports FDA is proposing several amendments to the requirements for IND safety reports in §312.32. FDA is proposing to alter the period for submitting written safety reports, under §312.32(c)(1)(i) and (d)(3), from 10 working days to 15 calendar days, and for submitting safety reports by telephone, under §312.32(c)(2), from 3 working days to 7 calendar days. FDA is also proposing to allow telephone safety reports to be made by facsimile transmission as well as orally by telephone. These changes will give sponsors additional time to gather appropriate data to help interpret the reports before submitting these reports. FDA believes the extended time period would be sufficient to alert the agency to potential safety problems, especially because of the new investigational reporting requirements the agency is proposing. Proposed §312.32(c) would also permit sponsors to submit IND safety reports to the agency by using FDA Form 3500A. If FDA determined that insufficient data were submitted on FDA Form 3500A, the agency could require additional narrative data to be submitted. As explained elsewhere in this proposal, this amendment is consistent with the proposal to use this form for postmarketing reporting of human drug and licensed biological product adverse experiences. FDA is also proposing to amend the disclaimer contained in §312.32(e) to emphasize that safety information submitted to FDA are not to be considered admissions of causation or liability. The proposal would substitute the word ``part'' for ``section'' so that the revised disclaimer would clearly apply to all safety information submitted under part 312. Summaries of such safety information would not constitute a statement or admission that there was a causal link between the administration of the drug and the subsequent adverse event. 3. Semiannual Reports FDA is proposing to amend the periodic reporting requirements in §312.33 by adding, in addition to the annual report, a semiannual death and serious adverse experiences report. This change is intended to ensure that reports of deaths and other serious adverse experiences in all clinical studies are collected and reviewed in a timely and comprehensive manner, and that the possibility of drug relatedness is always considered. Under current regulations, sponsors must report deaths and serious and unexpected adverse experiences within 3 or 10 working days only if the events are associated with the use of the drug. ``Associated with the use of the drug'' is defined to mean that there is a reasonable possibility that the experience may have been caused by the drug (see §312.32(a)). Deaths and a summary of serious adverse experiences that occur in a clinical trial that the sponsor concludes are not associated with use of the drug must be reported only in an IND annual report. The task force found that many adverse experiences occurring during the FIAU study that appear, in retrospect, to have been drug related were not reported in safety reports, although, at times, they were reported in the annual report as attributable to causes other than FIAU. The proposed rule, therefore, would create a new ``semiannual report'' to require, among other things, the submission of reports of all deaths, serious adverse experiences, and study discontinuations resulting from an adverse experience, whether expected or unexpected and whether or not there was thought to be a possibility that the death or adverse experience was caused by the drug. In these twice yearly reports, sponsors would also report all deaths and serious adverse experiences that occurred during the trial or within the prescribed followup period. The report would include data not only from studies conducted under the IND, but also data from all premarketing studies of the drug conducted worldwide, with an analysis of all unexpected deaths, serious adverse experiences, and study discontinuations thought to be related to the study drug from foreign postmarketing clinical trials and from foreign postmarketing spontaneous or required reporting systems. Serious adverse events should include laboratory changes that result in discontinuation or that are identified in the study protocol as reportable events. Sponsors would present these data both for the 6-month reporting interval and cumulatively, and submit an analysis of the data. The agency would expect the analysis to conform generally to the evaluation of deaths, serious adverse experiences, and discontinuations in the section entitled ``Integrated Summary of Safety Information'' in FDA's ``Guideline for the Format and Content of the Clinical and Statistical Sections of New Drug Applications.'' FDA also recommends that the sponsor employ, in preparing the analysis, at least one individual who had no involvement in conducting the clinical study. The proposal would also require a sponsor to conduct a ``worst-case'' analysis of the safety data, presuming that observed adverse events were the result of toxicity from the investigational drug, and then attempt to refute this presumption, with appropriate data and evaluations (task force report at 59). The analysis should include estimates of the rate of an analyzed event occurring spontaneously in the population and specific analyses of cases. The sponsor would submit the semiannual report for the 6-month period following the day the IND goes into effect, and for each 6-month period thereafter, until the end of the followup period specified in the protocol. The report would be due within 60 days of the end of the reporting period. The semiannual safety report that is due during the same period as the annual report would be submitted with the annual report. The task force recommended (task force report at 59) that FDA require the submission of all available autopsy reports and medical reports concerning all deaths reported in these semiannual reports, because, in at least one instance during the FIAU study, the cause of death originally reported was not fully consistent with the autopsy and terminal medical reports later obtained for that subject. Proposed §312.33(b)(2) would require the submission of these reports and would require the sponsor to clarify any inconsistencies between these reports and the cause of death reported to FDA by the sponsor. FDA is proposing this requirement to help ensure that reports covering deaths submitted to the agency are complete and accurate. Under proposed §312.33(b)(3), at the request of the sponsor, or on its own initiative, FDA may modify certain semiannual reporting requirements where, for example, the clinical study endpoint is mortality or where the study is blinded and full compliance with the reporting requirement would require breaking the blind. FDA is proposing this provision because studies vary concerning the nature and seriousness of the disease to be treated, the number of subjects exposed to the drug, and the general pace at which the drug's development proceeds. 4. Special Safety Summary In new §312.37(a), FDA also proposes an additional mechanism to allow the agency to obtain safety data on investigational drugs and summaries of these data not otherwise obtained through other reporting requirements if, and when, these data are necessary. Most investigational drugs do not present unusual safety concerns, so that the safety data contained in the 6-month and annual reports, as well as the IND safety reports submitted under §312.32, would provide adequate information to allow FDA to observe drug safety. Some drugs, however, may raise significant safety concerns either anticipated or unanticipated, so that more comprehensive data on events that do not meet the definition of a serious adverse reaction as well as those that do are needed. Events that might trigger this heightened scrutiny include agency experience with similar drugs, animal toxicity study results, and information derived from IND safety, annual, or semiannual reports. As recommended by the task force (task force report at 59 and 60), the proposed regulation is drafted in general language to allow the agency, in consultation with the sponsor, flexibility in determining when a report should be required and what information it should contain. This flexibility is considered necessary because the specifics of the safety summary may vary from study to study. FDA anticipates that the safety summary will generally not only contain the results of the cumulative analysis of deaths and serious adverse experiences contained in the 6-month report, but also an analysis of related events of lesser seriousness. Although the task force recommended that FDA require safety summaries unless an exemption had been granted to the sponsor, FDA is proposing to require safety summaries only for those studies or products where the agency has determined that a specific need for them exists. FDA would generally expect safety summaries to be submitted within 30 days after they are requested; however, the agency recognizes that in cases where large amounts of data are required to be summarized and those data are not readily available or easily summarized, a longer period of time may be necessary to prepare the summary. 5. Final Clinical Study Report Information about FIAU risks and benefits that the sponsor might have derived from the process of collecting and analyzing study results was delayed or never developed because final reports were not required for the earlier clinical studies of FIAU and FIAC (a closely related nucleoside analog). Thus, FDA is proposing in §312.37(b) to require sponsors to submit, when required by FDA, a final report or study summary of a clinical study. FDA anticipates that final reports usually will not be necessary. Instituting requirements for semiannual reporting of deaths, serious adverse experiences, and discontinuations, and for summarization of all safety data will largely fulfill the need for more careful monitoring and analysis of potential drug toxicity during drug testing. In some cases, however, it may still be valuable to have available an analysis of the results of particular trials; e.g., to provide data on the likely effectiveness of a drug for purposes of weighing risks against likely benefits to study subjects. The proposal would require final clinical study reports to be submitted within 90 days of a request from FDA, but provides for exceptions under extraordinary circumstances. 6. Clinical Holds Section 312.42 currently allows FDA to delay a proposed clinical investigation or to suspend an ongoing investigation under certain circumstances. Under the proposal, FDA would amend §312.42 to allow the agency to place an investigation on clinical hold if the sponsor fails to submit a special safety summary or final clinical study report. If the same or a closely related drug is the subject of a concurrent investigation, conducted by the same sponsor, proposed §312.42(b)(1)(v) would require safety summaries from all investigations or the agency could place any of the investigations on clinical hold. FDA believes this is appropriate because data from all studies involving the drug or closely related drugs may help FDA evaluate the safety of each study. 7. Termination FDA is also proposing in §312.44(b)(1)(viii) to amend the regulations regarding termination so that failure to submit a semiannual report would be grounds for terminating an IND. Failure to submit an annual report is already grounds for terminating an IND, and FDA is aware of no reason why semiannual and annual reports should be treated differently in this matter. FDA considers that failure to implement an adequate safety monitoring and evaluation program, as described in proposed 21 CFR 312.56(c), would be grounds for either a clinical hold under §312.42 or a termination of the IND under §312.44, since failure to have a program in place would mean that ``[h]uman subjects are or would be exposed to an unreasonable and significant risk of illness or injury,'' which is currently grounds for either a clinical hold or termination. 8. Review of Ongoing Investigations FDA is also proposing to amend §312.64(b) to require investigators to submit safety data to sponsors necessary to allow sponsors to comply with the other proposed safety reporting requirements, such as the proposed semiannual report. The proposed amendment would require the investigator to comply with safety reporting requirements established in the protocol for the study. Current §312.64(b) requires investigators to report adverse effects if they may reasonably be regarded as caused by, or probably caused by, the drug. If the adverse effects are alarming, they are to be reported to the sponsor immediately. These provisions are being retained as minimal requirements which must be met, even if the protocol does not require the events to be reported. G. Written Procedures for Monitoring Adverse Experiences FDA is also proposing to amend §§310.305(a) and 314.80(b) for marketed human drug products and §600.80(b) for licensed biological products to require applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors to develop written procedures for the surveillance, receipt, evaluation, and reporting of adverse experiences to FDA. This requirement would improve postmarketing surveillance by applicants or manufacturers and would enhance an applicant's or manufacturer's ability to evaluate and report adverse experiences to the agency. FDA believes that this provision would not impose a new burden on applicants and manufacturers, because it codifies a practice that is already customary and usual in the pharmaceutical industry for handling adverse experiences. Based on field inspections, FDA is aware that many manufacturers already have written procedures for the receipt, evaluation, and reporting of adverse experiences to FDA. The agency also notes that the current good manufacturing practice (CGMP) regulations for finished pharmaceuticals, which apply to manufacturers of all marketed human drug and biological products, require written procedures describing the handling of all written and oral complaints regarding a drug product (21 CFR 211.198). Furthermore, the agency's ``Guideline For Postmarketing Reporting of Adverse Drug Experiences'' (Ref. 4), which provides guidance on adverse drug experiences reported under §§310.305 and 314.80, states (at page 17) that: Each applicant should develop standardized, formal procedures for the surveillance, receipt, evaluation, and reporting of ADE's to FDA. * * * All applicants should develop procedures that allow expedited adverse experience report handling, and the applicant should keep on file documentation of due diligence. Elsewhere in this issue of the Federal Register FDA is announcing the availability of a guideline entitled ``Guideline for Adverse Experience Reporting for Licensed Biological Products.'' This guideline discusses the reports required by §600.80 and provides guidance concerning appropriate means of meeting the reporting requirements. H. Resubmission of Reports Received From FDA Under the MedWatch program, FDA will transmit reports of spontaneously reported serious adverse experiences received by the agency to the applicant, manufacturer, packer, or distributor (as appropriate) on an expedited basis. Consequently, FDA is proposing to revise §§310.305(c), 314.80(b), and 600.80(b) to state that applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors should not resubmit to the agency reports of adverse experiences that the agency has forwarded to them. In addition, FDA is proposing to revise §§314.80(c)(1)(i) and 600.80(c)(1)(i) to remove the phrase ``regardless of source'' from the description of which adverse experiences are reported to FDA. These revisions are intended to reduce duplicate reporting of adverse experiences to the agency, consistent with the reporting instructions in new FDA Form 3500A. FDA notes, however, that applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors receiving reports forwarded to them by FDA are required to handle these reports as they would any others and that followup, if obtained, is to be sent to the agency as specified in the regulation. These followup reports should be included, where appropriate, in the postmarketing adverse experience periodic report. FDA is also proposing that applicants and licensed manufacturers incorporate into any safety analysis (i.e., periodic reports, increased frequency reports) the expedited reports received from FDA, whether or not additional followup information was obtained, and any information received through Freedom of Information requests. I. Other Revisions to the Reporting Requirements FDA is proposing to remove §§314.80(c)(2)(iii) and 600.80(c)(2)(iii). These paragraphs state that periodic reporting for non-15-day Alert reports does not apply to adverse drug experience information obtained from postmarketing studies and reports in the scientific literature and from foreign marketing experience. FDA is proposing to remove these paragraphs because this information would now be required under the proposed revisions to the contents of a periodic report. Current regulations, at §314.80(c)(1)(ii), require applicants and, at §600,80(c)(1)ii), licensed manufacturers to ``review periodically (at least as often as the periodic reporting cycle)'' the frequency of reports of adverse experiences and report any significant increase in frequency to FDA. Similarly, current §310.305(c)(4) requires manufacturers, packers,and distributors to ``review periodically (at least once each year)'' the frequency of reports of adverse experiences and report any significant increase in frequency to FDA. In order to provide consistency with the proposed semiannual reporting requirements for periodic adverse experience reports under §§314.80 and 600.80, FDA is proposing to amend §310.305 to require manufacturers, packers, and distributors to review periodically, at least twice each year, the frequency of adverse experience reports for the purposes of making increased frequency reports to FDA. FDA is also proposing to amend §§310.305(c) and 314.80(c) by reorganizing, renumbering, and retitling the paragraphs in these sections to distinguish between postmarketing 15&hyph;day Alert reports, followups to postmarketing 15&hyph;day Alert reports, and increased frequency reports. The proposed amendments would also distinguish between the reporting intervals for postmarketing 15&hyph;day Alert reports and the revised intervals proposed for postmarketing periodic reports. FDA is also proposing to amend §§310.305(c)(1) through (c)(4) and 314.80(c)(1)(i), through (c)(1)(iv) to alter the period for submitting postmarketing ``15&hyph;day'' Alert reports from 15 working days to 15 calendar days. This change should decrease misunderstandings with the reporting requirements as all timeframes would now be stated in terms of calendar days. In addition, this change would increase consistency between the premarketing and postmarketing reporting requirements. FDA is also proposing to amend §§310.305(c)(2), 314.80(c)(1)(ii), and 600.80(c)(1)(ii) to require applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors who have been unable to obtain additional information about adverse experiences that are the subject of postmarketing 15-day Alert reports to maintain records of their attempts to seek additional information. These proposed revisions will help ensure that applicants or manufacturers are making good faith efforts to investigate adverse experiences that are the subject of postmarketing 15-day Alert reports. Finally, FDA is proposing to amend §§310.305(d)(3)(ii) and 314.80(f)(3)(ii) to instruct applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors that, before using an alternative reporting form instead of FDA Form 3500A, they must obtain approval from MedWatch: The FDA Medical Products Reporting Program, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20852&hyph;9787. Current regulations require prior approval from the Division of Epidemiology and Surveillance for human drug products. J. Distribution Reports As stated earlier, the proposed rule would change the reporting interval for licensed biological product distribution reports to be consistent with the suggested CIOMS standardized reporting period for postmarketing adverse drug experience periodic reports. Licensed biological product distribution reports would be based on the international birth date and data lock-point. The proposal would also remove §600.81 and move the regulatory requirements for licensed biological product distribution reports to §600.80(c)(3). K. Multiple Reports FDA is proposing to amend §600.80(g) concerning multiple reports by adding information pertaining to a licensed biological product for which a licensed manufacturer holds more than one biological product license. This revision would be consistent with the requirements in §314.80(g). L. Guidelines FDA is proposing to amend §§314.80(j) and 600.80(j) to indicate where guidelines for the submission of adverse experience reports may be obtained. In addition, FDA is adding this information in §310.305(g) for the submission of adverse experience reports for prescription drugs without an approved application. For human drug products, the guidelines may be obtained from the CDER Executive Secretariat Staff (HFD&hyph;8), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 7500 Standish Pl., Rockville, MD 20855, and for licensed biological products from the Congressional and Consumer Affairs Branch (HFM&hyph;12), Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 1401 Rockville Pike, suite 200N, Rockville, MD 20852&hyph;1448. M. Proposed Implementation Scheme FDA proposes that any final rule that may issue based on this proposal become effective 30 days after its date of publication in the Federal Register . All applications for human drug or licensed biological products approved on or after the effective date of any final regulation would be subject to the periodic reporting time periods based on the international birth date. All human drug and licensed biological product applications approved before the effective date of any final regulation would use the U.S. approval date as the international birth date. III. Request for Comments Interested persons may, on or before January 25, 1995, submit to the Dockets Management Branch (address above) written comments regarding this proposal. Two copies of any comments are to be submitted, except that individuals may submit one copy. Comments are to be identified with the docket number found in brackets in the heading of this document. Received comments may be seen in the office above between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday. IV. Environmental Impact The agency has determined under 21 CFR 25.24(a)(8) that this action is of a type that does not individually or cumulatively have a significant effect on the human environment. Therefore, neither an environmental assessment nor an environmental impact statement is required. V. Analysis of Impacts FDA has examined the impacts of the proposed rule under Executive Order 12866 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act (Pub. L. 96&hyph;354). Executive Order 12866 directs agencies to assess all costs and benefits of available regulatory alternatives and, when regulation is necessary, to select regulatory approaches that maximize net benefits (including potential economic, environmental, public health and safety, and other advantages; distributive impacts; and equity). The agency believes that this proposed rule is consistent with the regulatory philosophy and principles identified in the Executive Order. In addition, the proposed rule is not a significant regulatory action as defined by the Executive Order and so is not subject to review under the Executive Order. The economic costs imposed on the industry as a result of this proposed rule are the costs associated with reporting deaths, serious adverse experiences, or clinical study discontinuations. Reporting burdens on the industry resulting from FDA regulations are analyzed under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. Based on an estimated total of 480,602 annual burden hours, FDA has estimated that the total annual reporting cost to the industry as a result of this proposed rule would be $ 24,030,100 (the estimated per hour cost to the industry is $ 50). In addition, the rule may increase certain nonpaperwork activities. For example, added costs may result if the formal control groups suggested in §312.23(a)(6)(iii)(i) prompts additional clinical trial control arms, or if the implementation of the followup plan required in §312.23(a)(6)(iii)(k) provokes more elaborate monitoring procedures. At this time, FDA cannot predict the extent of these actions, but welcomes public comment on issues regarding the scope or cost of these activities. The Regulatory Flexibility Act requires agencies to analyze regulatory options that would minimize any significant impact of a rule on small entities. The agency certifies that the proposed rule will not have a significant economic impact on a substantial number of small entities. Therefore, under the Regulatory Flexibility Act, no further analysis is required. VI. Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 This proposed rule contains information collection requirements which are subject to review by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. The title, description, and respondents of the information collection requirements are shown below. Title : Adverse Experience Reporting Requirements For Human Drug and Licensed Biological Products. Description : FDA is proposing to amend its current adverse experience reporting requirements to replace current Form FDA&hyph;1639 with new FDA Form 3500A; to revise certain definitions and reporting periods and formats; to require applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors to develop written procedures for monitoring and reporting adverse experiences; and to make other revisions to provide uniformity to the reporting regulations. These changes would simplify and facilitate the reporting of adverse events and product problems under a single form and help harmonize international adverse event reporting requirements. In addition, FDA is proposing to amend the sponsor reporting requirements in part 312. Description of Respondents : Businesses or other for profit and small businesses or organizations. The burden hours for §§310.305 and 314.80 are approved under OMB information collection number 0910&hyph;0230. The burden hours for §600.80 have been submitted to OMB for approval and can be found elsewhere in this issue of the Federal Register . FDA estimates no change in the burden hours that have already been approved. OMB has approved use of the new form, under OMB information collection number 0910&hyph;0291, through December 1994. The new recordkeeping requirements under §310.305(c)(2), 314.80(c)(1)(ii), and 600.80(c)(1)(ii), that applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors maintain records of unsuccessful attempts to obtain additional followup information on 15-day ``Alert reports,'' would be negligible and would result in no change in the burden hours that have already been approved. The new requirements under §§310.305(a), 314.80(b), and 600.80(b), that applicants or manufacturers, packers, and distributors develop written procedures for the surveillance, receipt, evaluation, and reporting of adverse experiences, would not impose a new burden because they codify a practice that is already customary and usual in the pharmaceutical industry for handling adverse experiences. The more extensive list of contents for the periodic postmarketing adverse experience report, in proposed §§314.80(c)(2)(ii) and 600.80(c)(2)(ii), would result in an increased reporting burden on the industry. As indicated in the accompanying chart, the proposed periodic reporting requirements would require, on an average, 19 additional hours for respondents to prepare. The proposal would also increase the reporting requirements for sponsors under part 312. As indicated in the accompanying chart, the proposed amendments to part 312 would result in an increase of 167,900 burden hours on the industry. Estimated Total Annual Reporting Burden 1Section 1Number of respondents 1Responses per respondent 1Total annual responses 1Hours per response 1Total hours 312.23(a)(3) and (a)(6) 1,623 1 1,623 4 6,492 312.33(b) 1,517 2.6 3,944 40 157,760 312.37(a) 152 1 152 16 2,432 312.37(b) 152 1 152 8 1,216 314.80(c)(2) 528 30.50 16,106 19 306,014 600.80(c)(2) 63 5.58 352 19 6,688 n,n,n,n,n,s Total ␣ ␣ ␣ ␣ 480,602 As required by section 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, FDA has submitted a copy of this proposed rule to OMB for its review of these information collection requirements. Other organizations and individuals desiring to submit comments regarding the burden estimate or any aspects of these information collection requirements, including suggestions for reducing the burden, should direct them to FDA's Dockets Management Branch (address above) and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, OMB, rm. 3208, New Executive Office Bldg., Washington, DC 20503, Attn: Desk Officer for FDA. VII. References The following references have been placed on display in the Dockets Management Branch (address above) and may be seen by interested persons between 9 a.m. to 4 p.m., Monday through Friday. 1. ``International Reporting of Adverse Drug Reactions,'' Final Report of the CIOMS Working Group, 1990. 2. ``International Reporting of Periodic Drug Safety Update Summaries,'' Final Report of the CIOMS Working Group II, 1992. 3. ``Fialuridine: Hepatic and Pancreatic Toxicity,'' FDA Task Force Report, November 12, 1993. 4. ``Guideline for Postmarketing Reporting of Adverse Drug Experiences,'' FDA, Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, March 1992. List of Subjects 21 CFR Part 20 Confidential business information, Courts, Freedom of information, Government employees. 21 CFR Part 310 Administrative practice and procedure, Drugs, Labeling, Medical devices, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements. 21 CFR Part 312 Drugs, Exports, Imports, Investigations, Labeling, Medical research, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Safety. 21 CFR Part 314 Administrative practice and procedure, Confidential business information, Drugs, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements. 21 CFR Part 600 Biologics, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements. Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, the Public Health Service Act, and under authority delegated to the Commissioner of Food and Drugs, it is proposed that 21 CFR parts 20, 310, 312, 314, and 600 be amended as follows: PART 20_PUBLIC INFORMATION 1. The authority citation for 21 CFR part 20 continues to read as follows: Authority : Secs. 201&hyph;903 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 321&hyph;393); secs. 301, 302, 303, 307, 310, 311, 351, 352, 354&hyph;360F, 361, 362, 1701&hyph;1706, 2101 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 241, 242, 242a, 242l, 242n, 243, 262, 263, 263b&hyph;263n, 264, 265, 300u&hyph;300u&hyph;5, 300aa&hyph;1); 5 U.S.C. 552; 18 U.S.C. 1905. §20.112 [Amended] 2. Section 20.112 Voluntary drug experience reports submitted by physicians and hospitals is amended in paragraph (a) by removing the words ``Form FDA&hyph;1639'' and adding in their place ``FDA Form 3500''. PART 310_NEW DRUGS 3. The authority citation for 21 CFR part 310 continues to read as follows: Authority : Secs. 201, 301, 501, 502, 503, 505, 506, 507, 512&hyph;516, 520, 601(a), 701, 704, 705, 721 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 321, 331, 351, 352, 353, 355, 356, 357, 360b&hyph;360f, 360j, 361(a), 371, 374, 375, 379e); secs. 215, 301, 302(a), 351, 354&hyph;360F of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 216, 241, 242(a), 262, 263b&hyph;263n). 4. Section 310.305 is amended by adding a new sentence at the end of the concluding text of paragraph (a); by revising paragraphs (b), (c), (d)(3)(ii), and (d)(4); by removing in paragraph (d)(1) the words ``Form FDA&hyph;1639 (Adverse Reaction Report)'' and adding in their place ``FDA Form 3500A''; by removing in paragraph (d)(2), the introductory text of paragraph (d)(3), and paragraph (d)(3)(i) the words ``Form FDA&hyph;1639'' and adding in their place ``FDA Form 3500A''; by removing in paragraph (f)(1) the words ``paragraph (c)(5)'' and adding in their place the words ``paragraph (c)(4)''; and by redesignating paragraph (g) as paragraph (h) and by adding new paragraph (g) to read as follows: §310.305 Records and reports concerning adverse drug experiences on marketed prescription drugs for human use without approved new drug applications. (a) *␣*␣* Manufacturers, packers, and distributors shall also develop written procedures for the surveillance, receipt, evaluation, and reporting of adverse drug experiences to FDA. (b) Definitions . The following definitions of terms apply to this section: (1) FDA means the Food and Drug Administration. (2) Adverse drug experience means any adverse event associated with the use of a drug in humans, whether or not considered drug related, including the following: An adverse event occurring in the course of the use of a drug product in professional practice; an adverse event occurring from drug overdose; an adverse event occurring from drug withdrawal; and any failure of expected pharmacological action. (3) Disability means a substantial disruption of a person's ability to carry out normal life functions. (4) Increased frequency means an increase in the rate of occurrence of a particular adverse drug experience, e.g., an increased number of reports of particular adverse drug experience after appropriate adjustment for drug exposure. (5) Life-threatening means that the patient was, in the view of the initial reporter, at immediate risk of death from the adverse drug experience as it occurred. It does not include an adverse drug experience that, had it occurred in a more serious form, might have caused death. For example, product-induced hepatitis that resolved without evidence of hepatic failure would not be considered life-threatening even though hepatitis of a more severe nature can be fatal. Similarly, an allergic reaction resulting in angioedema of the face would not be life-threatening, although angioedema of the larynx, allergic bronchospasm, or anaphylaxis can be fatal. (6) Serious means an adverse drug experience occurring at any dose that is fatal or life-threatening, results in persistent or significant disability/incapacity, requires or prolongs inpatient hospitalization, necessitates medical or surgical intervention to preclude permanent impairment of a body function or permanent damage to a body structure, or is a congenital anomaly. (7) Unexpected means an adverse drug experience that is not listed in the current labeling for the drug product and includes an event that may be symptomatically and pathophysiologically related to an event listed in the labeling, but differs from the event because of greater severity or specificity. For example, under this definition, hepatic necrosis would be unexpected (by virtue of greater severity) if the labeling only referred to elevated hepatitic enzymes or hepatitis. Similarly, cerebral thromboembolism and cerebral vasculitis would be unexpected (by virtue of greater specificity) if the labeling only listed cerebral vascular accidents. (c) Reporting requirements . Each person identified in paragraph (c)(1) of this section shall report to FDA adverse drug experience information as described in this section and shall submit one copy of each report to the Division of Epidemiology and Surveillance (HFD&hyph;730), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. (1) Postmarketing 15&hyph;Day ``Alert reports'' . (i) Any person whose name appears on the label of a marketed prescription drug product as its manufacturer, packer, or distributor shall report to FDA each adverse drug experience received or otherwise obtained that is both serious and unexpected as soon as possible, but in any case, within 15 calendar days of initial receipt of the information. Each report shall be accompanied by a copy of the current labeling for the drug product. (ii) A person identified in paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section is not required to submit a 15-day ``Alert report'' for an adverse drug experience obtained from a postmarketing study (whether or not conducted under an investigational new drug application) unless the applicant concludes that there is a reasonable possibility that the drug caused the adverse experience. (2) Postmarketing 15&hyph;Day ``Alert reports''_followup . Each person identified in paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section shall promptly investigate all serious, unexpected adverse drug experiences that are the subject of these 15-day postmarketing Alert reports and shall submit followup reports within 15 calendar days of receipt of new information or as requested by FDA. If additional information is not obtainable, records should be maintained of the unsuccessful steps taken to seek additional information. (3) Increased frequency report . Each person identified in paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section shall review periodically (at least twice each year) the frequency of reports of adverse drug experiences that are both serious and expected and reports of therapeutic failure (lack of effect), received or otherwise obtained, and report any significant increase in frequency as soon as possible, but in any case within 15 calendar days of determining that a significant increase in frequency exists. Reports of a significant increase in frequency are required to be submitted in narrative form (including the time period on which the increased frequency is based, the method of analysis, and the interpretation of the results) rather than using FDA Form 3500A. (4) Submission of reports . In order to avoid unnecessary duplication in the submission of, and followup to, reports required in this section, including reports required by paragraph (c)(3) of this section, a packer's or distributor's obligations may be met by submission of all reports of serious adverse drug experiences to the manufacturer of the drug product. If a packer or distributor elects to submit these adverse drug experience reports to the manufacturer rather than to FDA, it shall submit each report to the manufacturer within 3 calendar days of its receipt by the packer or distributor, and the manufacturer shall then comply with the requirements of this section even if its name does not appear on the label of the drug product. Under this circumstance, the packer or distributor shall maintain a record of this action which shall include: (i) A copy of each drug experience report. (ii) Date the report was received by the packer or distributor. (iii) Date the report was submitted to the manufacturer. (iv) Name and address of the manufacturer. (5) Each report submitted to FDA under this section shall bear prominent identification as to its contents, i.e., ``15-day Alert report,'' ``15-day Alert report_followup,'' or ``Increased frequency report.'' (6) A person identified in paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section should not resubmit to FDA reports forwarded to that person by FDA; however, all followup information must be submitted to FDA. (d) *␣*␣* (3) *␣*␣* (ii) The format is agreed to in advance by MedWatch: The FDA Medical Products Reporting Program. (4) Ten copies or fewer of FDA Form 3500A and/or a copy of the instructions for completing the form may be obtained from the Division of Epidemiology and Surveillance (HFD&hyph;730), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. More than 10 copies of the form may be obtained by writing to the Consolidated Forms and Publications Distribution Center, Washington Commerce Center, 3222 Hubbard Rd., Landover, MD 20785. * * * * * (g) Guideline . FDA has prepared under §10.90(b) of this chapter a guideline for the submission of reports of adverse drug experiences and suggested followup investigation of reports. Copies of this guideline may be obtained from the CDER Executive Secretariat Staff (HFD&hyph;8), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 7500 Standish Pl., Rockville, MD 20855. * * * * * PART 312_INVESTIGATIONAL NEW DRUG APPLICATION 5. The authority citation for 21 CFR part 312 continues to read as follows: Authority : Secs. 201, 301, 501, 502, 503, 505, 506, 507, 701 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 321, 331, 351, 352, 353, 355, 356, 357, 371); sec. 351 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 262). 6. Section 312.23 is amended by adding new paragraph (a)(3)(v) and paragraphs (a)(6)(iii)( h ) through (a)(6)(iii)( k ) to read as follows: §312.23 IND content and format. (a) *␣*␣* (3) *␣*␣* (v) A description of the safety monitoring and evaluation program developed by the sponsor in order to evaluate safety data reported by investigators. * * * * * (6) *␣*␣* (iii) *␣*␣* ( h ) A description of any adverse clinical or laboratory outcomes in the study that are to be reported by the investigators to the sponsor immediately. This would ordinarily include any death, any life-threatening event, any serious event that might reflect potential toxicity, as suggested by preclinical data, laboratory values that exceed specified limits, or any markedly abnormal laboratory value. The identified events and abnormal laboratory values are to include those that focus attention on toxicity that may target the same organs and body systems as the underlying disease or concomitant medications for the disease. The events are to be reported to the sponsor even if they are potentially attributable to the patient's underlying disease or to other medications the patient may have received. This section of the protocol shall include instructions for the investigator encountering such an event, such as reporting requirements, a remeasurement or challenge procedure, or discontinuation of the study drug. ( i ) Sponsors should consider use of a formal control group (for example, placebo, active, documented historical) in studies that focus on safety when the underlying disease is likely to produce serious adverse events that might be confused with drug toxicity. ( j ) The sponsor shall estimate the expected incidence of deaths and serious adverse experiences in the study population that may arise from the underlying disease or from medications used to treat the underlying disease. Deaths or serious adverse experiences that exceed these estimates would create a presumption that the events are associated with the use of the investigational drug. ( k ) The sponsor shall determine and include in each protocol an appropriate followup period and appropriate followup procedures based on preclinical data, experience with other members of the drug class, the drug's mechanism of action, and prior human experience. The sponsor shall include a brief description of the rationale used in selecting the followup period and procedures. The intensity of the followup may change with time; e.g., a full evaluation might be scheduled for 2 weeks after the end of drug dosing, with a telephone followup at a later time. Ordinarily, in Phase 1 and 2 studies, there should be at least telephone followup for 3 months after drug dosing is completed, but alternative timeframes and procedures can be proposed by the sponsor. In some cases, available information may dictate followup periods longer than 3 months. * * * * * 7. Section 312.32 is amended in paragraph (a) by revising the second sentence in the definition for ``Serious adverse experience,'' paragraph (c)(1)(i), the first sentence in paragraph (c)(2), paragraph (d)(3), and in paragraph (e) by removing the word ``section'' and replacing it with the word ``part'' to read as follows: §312.32 IND safety reports. (a) *␣*␣* Serious adverse experience *␣*␣* A serious adverse drug experience means an experience occurring at any dose that is fatal or life-threatening, results in permanent or significant disability/incapacity, requires or prolongs inpatient hospitalization, necessitates medical or surgical intervention to preclude permanent impairment of a body function or permanent damage to a body structure, or is a congenital anomaly. *␣*␣* * * * * * (c) IND safety reports _(1) Written reports . (i) The sponsor shall notify FDA and all participating investigators in a written IND safety report of any adverse experience associated with use of the drug that is both serious and unexpected. This includes notification of any death or other serious adverse experience that exceeds the estimate of the expected incidence of deaths and serious adverse experiences required under §312.23(a)(6)(iii)( j ). Such notification shall be made as soon as possible and in no event later than 15 calendar days after the sponsor's initial receipt of the information. Each written notification may be submitted on FDA Form 3500A or in a narrative form and shall bear prominent identification of its contents, i.e., ``IND Safety Report.'' Each written notification to FDA shall be transmitted to the FDA division of the Center for Drug Evaluation and Research or the Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research that has responsibility for review of the IND. If FDA determines that insufficient data were submitted on FDA Form 3500A, the agency may require further narrative data to be submitted. * * * * * (2) Telephone safety reports . The sponsor shall also notify FDA by telephone, either orally or by facsimile transmission, of any unexpected fatal or life-threatening experience associated with the use of the drug no later than 7 calendar days after the sponsor's initial receipt of the information. *␣*␣* * * * * * (d) *␣*␣* (3)If the results of a sponsor's investigation show that an adverse experience not initially determined to be reportable under paragraph (c) of this section is so reportable, the sponsor shall report such experience in a written safety report as soon as possible after the determination is made, but in no event longer than 15 calendar days. * * * * * 8. Section 312.33 is revised to read as follows: §312.33 Annual and semiannual reports. (a) Annual reports . A sponsor shall within 60 days of the anniversary date that the IND went into effect, submit a brief report of the progress of the investigation that includes: (1) Individual study information . A brief summary of the status of each study in progress and each study completed during the previous year. The summary is required to include the following information for each study: (i) The title of the study (with any appropriate study identifiers such as protocol number), its purpose, a brief statement identifying the patient population, and a statement as to whether the study is completed. (ii) The total number of subjects initially planned for inclusion in the study, the number entered into the study to date, the number whose participation in the study was completed as planned, and the number who dropped out of the study for any reason. (iii) If the study has been completed, or if interim results are known, a brief description of any available study results. (2) Summary information . Information obtained during the previous year's clinical and nonclinical investigations, including: (i) A narrative or tabular summary showing the most frequent and most serious adverse experiences by body system. (ii) A summary of all IND safety reports submitted during the past year. (iii) A list of subjects who died during participation in the investigation, with the cause of death for each subject. (iv) A list of subjects who dropped out during the course of the investigation in association with any adverse experience, whether or not thought to be drug related. (v) A brief description of what, if anything, was obtained that is pertinent to an understanding of the drug's actions, including, for example, information from controlled trials, and information about bioavailability. (vi) A list of the preclinical studies (including animal studies) completed or in progress during the past year and a summary of the major preclinical findings. (vii) A summary of any significant manufacturing or microbiological changes made during the past year. (3) A description of the general investigational plan for the coming year to replace that submitted 1 year earlier. The general investigational plan shall contain the information required under §312.23(a)(3)(iv). (4) If the investigator brochure has been revised, a description of the revision and a copy of the new brochure. (5) A description of any significant Phase 1 protocol modifications made during the previous year and not previously reported to the IND in a protocol amendment. (6) A brief summary of significant foreign marketing developments with the drug during the past year, such as approval of marketing in any country or withdrawal or suspension from marketing in any country. (7) If desired by the sponsor, a log of any outstanding business with respect to the IND for which the sponsor requests or expects a reply, comment, or meeting. (b) Semiannual reports . A sponsor shall submit a report of the progress of the investigation with respect to safety issues for the 6-month period following the day the IND goes into effect, and for each 6-month period thereafter, until the end of the followup period specified in the protocol. The report shall be due within 60 days of the end of the reporting period. The semiannual safety report that is due during the same period as the annual report required under paragraph (a) of this section shall be submitted with the annual report. These semiannual reports shall include: (1) A summary and analysis of all deaths, all serious adverse experiences, and all study discontinuations resulting from an adverse experience that occurred during the study or within the prescribed followup period, whether the deaths or adverse experiences were expected or unexpected and whether or not there is thought to be a possibility that the death or adverse experience or study discontinuation was caused by the drug. This summary shall include data not only from studies conducted under the IND, but also data from all premarketing studies of the drug conducted worldwide, with an analysis of all unexpected deaths, serious adverse experiences, and study discontinuations thought to be related to the study drug from foreign postmarketing clinical trials and from foreign postmarketing spontaneous or required reporting systems. For purposes of this section, serious adverse events shall include laboratory changes identified in the study protocol as reportable events or that result in discontinuation. The sponsor shall present in the summary both the data that accumulated during the reporting period and cumulatively. The sponsor shall also submit an analysis of the data that assumes that the investigational drug is responsible for the deaths, serious adverse experiences, and study discontinuations, and refute, as feasible, this presumption with appropriate data and evaluations. The expected incidence of deaths and serious adverse experiences in the study population that may arise from the underlying disease or from medications used to treat the underlying disease that was estimated in the protocol should be considered in this evaluation. (2) All available autopsy reports and terminal medical reports concerning all deaths reported in this summary, with a discussion of any inconsistencies between autopsy and medical reports and the cause of death reported to FDA by the sponsor. (3) At the request of the sponsor, or on its own initiative, FDA may modify the requirements of paragraph (b) of this section. A sponsor requesting such a modification should submit to the division responsible for review of the IND a written request for modification and justification for such modification. FDA shall issue a written response to the sponsor either granting or denying, in whole or in part, the request for modification. (Collection of information requirements approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number 0910&hyph;0014) 9. Section 312.37 is added to read as follows: §312.37 Special safety summary and final clinical study report. (a) Special safety summary . Upon request of FDA, a sponsor shall prepare and submit special summaries of safety data regarding the investigational drug. These summaries may include safety data available to the sponsor from previous studies of the drug and of closely related drugs identified in consultation with FDA. Examples of types of events that may be requested to be summarized include, among others, deaths, serious adverse experiences, study discontinuations for safety reasons, patients who reach or exceed safety endpoints as defined in the protocol, and any unusual or extreme changes in study subjects. The special safety summary shall be submitted within 30 days after a request by the agency unless the sponsor demonstrates that extraordinary circumstances warrant a later date and the agency has agreed to that later date. (b) Final clinical study report . Upon request by FDA, a sponsor shall submit a final report on a clinical study. The final report shall be submitted within 90 calendar days after a request by the agency unless the sponsor demonstrates that extraordinary circumstances warrant a later date and the agency has agreed to that later date. 10. Section 312.42 is amended by adding paragraph (b)(1)(v) to read as follows: §312.42 Clinical holds and requests for modification. * * * * * (b) *␣*␣* (1) *␣*␣* (v) The sponsor has failed to submit a special safety summary or final clinical study report, as required by §312.37, for the drug that is the subject of the investigation. This provision applies to special safety summaries and final clinical study reports from other investigations on the same drug and special safety summaries and final clinical study reports requested by FDA for investigations on closely related drugs conducted by the sponsor. * * * * * 11. Section 312.44 is amended by revising paragraph (b)(1)(viii) to read as follows: §312.44 Termination. * * * * * (b) *␣*␣* (1) *␣*␣* (viii) The sponsor fails to submit an accurate and timely annual or semiannual safety report of the investigations in accordance with §312.33. * * * * * 12. Section 312.56 is amended by revising paragraph (c) to read as follows: §312.56 Review of ongoing investigations. * * * * * (c) Before the initiation of clinical studies, the sponsor shall develop a safety monitoring and evaluation program to evaluate safety data reported by the investigator(s). The sponsor shall review and evaluate the evidence relating to the safety and effectiveness of the drug as it is obtained from the investigator(s). The sponsor shall make such reports to FDA regarding information relevant to the safety of the drug as required under §§312.32 and 312.37. The sponsor shall make annual and semiannual safety reports in accordance with §312.33. * * * * * 13. Section 312.64 is amended by adding two sentences at the end of paragraph (b) to read as follows: §312.64 Investigator reports. * * * * * (b) *␣*␣* An investigator shall report to the sponsor all adverse clinical and laboratory outcomes that are required to be reported under the protocol for the study. These reports shall be made within the time period specified within the protocol. * * * * * PART 314_APPLICATIONS FOR FDA APPROVAL TO MARKET A NEW DRUG OR AN ANTIBIOTIC DRUG 14. The authority citation for 21 CFR part 314 continues to read as follows: Authority : Secs. 201, 301, 501, 502, 503, 505, 506, 507, 701, 704, 721 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 321, 331, 351, 352, 353, 355, 356, 357, 371, 374, 379e). 15. Section 314.80 is amended in paragraph (a) by alphabetically adding definitions for ``Data lock-point,'' ``Disability,'' ``International birth date,'' and ``Life-threatening,'' and by revising the definition of ``Serious;'' by adding two new sentences at the end of paragraph (b); by revising paragraph (c), the second sentence in paragraph (d)(1), paragraphs (f)(1), (f)(3)(ii), and (f)(4), and the last sentence in paragraph (l); by removing in paragraphs (f)(2) and the introductory text of paragraph (f)(3) the words ``Form FDA&hyph;1639'' and adding in their place the words ``FDA Form 3500A''; and by adding a new sentence at the end of paragraph (j) to read as follows: §314.80 Postmarketing reporting of adverse drug experiences. (a) *␣*␣* * * * * * Data lock-point means the date designated as the cutoff date for data to be incorporated into a specific postmarketing adverse drug experience periodic report. Data available to the applicant after this date will not be incorporated into the report, unless it represents important information. Disability means a substantial disruption of a person's ability to carry out normal life functions. * * * * * International birth date means the date that the first regulatory authority in the world approved the human drug product for marketing. Life-threatening means that the patient was, in the view of the initial reporter, at immediate risk of death from the adverse experience as it occurred. It does not include an adverse experience that, had it occurred in a more serious form, might have caused death. For example, product-induced hepatitis that resolved without evidence of hepatic failure would not be considered life-threatening even though hepatitis of a more severe nature can be fatal. Similarly, an allergic reaction resulting in angioedema of the face would not be life-threatening, even though angioedema of the larynx, allergic bronchospasm, or anaphylaxis can be fatal. Serious means an adverse drug experience occurring at any dose that is fatal or life-threatening, results in persistent or significant disability/incapacity, requires or prolongs inpatient hospitalization, necessitates medical or surgical intervention to preclude permanent impairment of a body function or permanent damage to a body structure, or is a congenital anomaly. * * * * * (b) *␣*␣* Applicants should not resubmit to FDA adverse product experience reports forwarded to the applicant by FDA; however, they should submit all followup information to FDA. Applicants shall also develop written procedures for the surveillance, receipt, evaluation, and reporting of adverse drug experiences. (c) Reporting requirements . The applicant shall report to FDA adverse drug experience information, as described in this section. The applicant shall submit two copies of each report described in this section to the Central Document Room, Park Bldg., rm. 2&hyph;14, 12420 Parklawn Dr., Rockville, MD 20857. FDA may waive the requirement for the second copy in appropriate instances. (1)(i) Postmarketing 15-day ``Alert reports'' . The applicant shall report each adverse drug experience that is both serious and unexpected as soon as possible but in any case within 15 calendar days of initial receipt of the information. These reports shall be submitted on FDA Form 3500A. (ii) Postmarketing Fifteen-day ``Alert reports''_followup . The applicant shall promptly investigate all adverse drug experiences that are the subject of these postmarketing 15-day Alert reports and shall submit followup reports within 15 calendar days of receipt of new information or as requested by FDA. If additional information is not obtainable, records should be maintained of the unsuccessful steps taken to seek additional information. These postmarketing 15-day Alert reports and followups to them shall be submitted under separate cover and may not be included, except for summary or tabular purposes, in a postmarketing adverse drug experience periodic report. (iii) Increased frequency report . The applicant shall review periodically (at least as often as the periodic reporting cycle) the frequency of reports of adverse drug experiences that are both serious and expected and reports of therapeutic failure (lack of effect), regardless of source, and report any significant increase in frequency as soon as possible but in any case within 15 calendar days of determining that a significant increase in frequency exists. Upon written notice, FDA may require that applicants review the frequency of reports of serious, expected adverse drug experiences at intervals different than the periodic reporting cycle. Reports of a significant increase in frequency are required to be submitted in narrative form (including the time period on which the increased frequency is based, the method of analysis, and the interpretation of the results), rather than using FDA Form 3500A. 15-day Alert reports based on increased frequency are required to be submitted under separate cover and may not be included, except for summary purposes, in a periodic report. (iv) Submission of reports . The requirements of paragraphs (c)(1)(i), (c)(1)(ii), and (c)(1)(iii) of this section, concerning the submission of postmarketing 15-day Alert reports, shall also apply to any person (other than the applicant) whose name appears on the label of an approved drug product as a manufacturer, packer, or distributor. However, in order to avoid unnecessary duplication in the submission to FDA of reports required by paragraphs (c)(1)(i), (c)(1)(ii), and (c)(1)(iii) of this section, obligations of a nonapplicant may be met by submission of all reports of serious adverse drug experiences to the applicant. If a nonapplicant elects to submit adverse drug experience reports to the applicant rather than to FDA, it shall submit each report to the applicant within 3 calendar days of its receipt by the nonapplicant, and the applicant shall then comply with the requirements of this section. Under this circumstance, the nonapplicant shall maintain a record of this action which shall include: (A) A copy of the drug experience report. (B) Date the report was received by the nonapplicant. (C) Date the report was submitted to the applicant. (D) Name and address of the applicant. (v) Report identification . Each report submitted under this paragraph shall bear prominent identification as to its contents, i.e., ``15-day Alert report,'' ``15-day Alert report_followup,'' or ``Increased frequency report.'' (2) Periodic adverse drug experience reports . (i) The applicant shall report every 6 months each adverse drug experience not reported under paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) of this section. The periodic reporting term shall be based upon the international birth date of the human drug product. The first 6-month anniversary of the international birth date after the application is approved in the United States is the data lock-point for the first periodic reporting term. Each subsequent 6-month anniversary of the international birth date is the data lock-point for subsequent periodic reporting terms for that particular product. Periodic reports shall be submitted to FDA within 45 days after the data lock-point. Upon written notice, FDA may require that the applicant submit reports under this section at times other than those stated. An applicant who wishes to submit periodic reports at different intervals must submit to FDA a request for a waiver under §314.90. Followup information to adverse drug experiences submitted initially in a periodic report may be submitted in the next periodic report. If the applicant does not receive any adverse experience reports during the reporting period, the applicant shall, in place of a periodic report, send a copy of the current approved U.S. labeling and a letter identifying the product, the application number, and the reporting period, stating that no adverse drug experience reports were received. (ii) Reports . Each periodic report shall contain: (A) Title page, table of contents, and introduction . The introduction shall be a summary of the periodic report with page references to detailed data and information. (B) Applicant's core safety data sheet . The applicant's core safety data sheet shall be a document prepared by the applicant that contains all relevant safety information, including adverse drug experiences, which the applicant believes should be listed for the drug in all countries where the drug is marketed. It may be used by the applicant as the reference document by which an adverse drug experience is judged to be expected or unexpected for purposes of this postmarketing periodic report. For all other determinations of whether an adverse drug experience is expected or unexpected, the definition in paragraph (a) of this section shall apply. ( 1 ) FDA recognizes that the postmarketing periodic report may be submitted by the applicant to multiple countries and the product may have different approved labels in the different countries. The use of the applicant's core safety data sheet as the reference document for determining whether an adverse drug experience is unexpected or not may result in some overreporting of unexpected adverse events that actually are expected by the U.S. approved product label. This is because the approved label for the United States may have more safety information included in it than the manufacturer's core safety data sheet. If an adverse event is not listed in the U.S. label, but is in the manufacturer's core safety data sheet, this shall be clearly noted in the ``Overall safety evaluation'' (see paragraph (c)(2) (ii)(H) of this section). This section also shall highlight clearly any changes and the reasons for the changes in the applicant's core safety data sheet since the previous postmarketing periodic report. ( 2 ) An applicant may also use the approved U.S. label as the reference by which expected and unexpected adverse drug experiences are determined for the postmarketing periodic report. If an applicant chooses to use the approved U.S. label for this purpose, it shall clearly be stated in this section of the report. (C) The product's marketing status . This section shall contain a table containing a chronological history of the marketing status of the product worldwide (all regulatory decisions affecting the product and all market launches) from the date it was first approved through its current status. Approvals or applications voluntarily withdrawn for safety reasons shall be included at a minimum. The product shall be listed by chemical (or proper name) and brand name(s). (D) Regulatory actions for safety reasons . This section shall contain a narrative identifying the reasons for significant regulatory authority or manufacturer-initiated actions taken anywhere in the world, or to be taken imminently, for safety reasons during the reporting period. This includes, for example, application withdrawal or license suspension or failure to renew, distribution restrictions, clinical trial suspension, labeling changes due to significant safety concerns, dosage modifications, or pharmaceutical changes. (E) Patient exposure . This section shall include the product's domestic and foreign marketing distribution data during the reporting period. This shall be used to calculate the extent of patient exposure. The method used by the manufacturer to estimate patient exposure shall always be described and shall include the total number of dosage units of each dosage form and strength or potency (e.g., 100,000/5-milligram tablets, 50,000/10-milliliter vials). (F) Individual case histories . This section shall consist of individual case reports of adverse drug experiences thought possibly associated with the use of the drug that are: ( 1 ) Serious, unexpected reports from published or unpublished clinical studies where the applicant has concluded that there is a reasonable possibility that the drug caused the adverse experience; ( 2 ) Serious, expected or unexpected spontaneous adverse drug experience reports and nonserious, unexpected spontaneous adverse drug experience reports (causality always assumed in spontaneous reports) received directly by the applicant from the initial reporter or received by the applicant from a drug regulatory authority, both U.S. or foreign; and ( 3 ) Serious, expected or unexpected, individual published case histories and nonserious, unexpected individual published case histories. ( 4 ) All of these reports in paragraphs (c)(2)(ii)(F)( 1 ) through (c)(2)(ii)(F)( 3 ) of this section shall be presented in line listing format with the following 10 columns: country, source, age, gender, dose, duration of treatment (prior to event), time to onset, description of reaction (as reported), outcome (e.g., fatal, resolved), other comments (e.g., manufacturer's report number). This format is consistent with that suggested by CIOMS. In addition, a tabular summary of the number of adverse events by body system may be included. This section shall end with an analysis by the reporter, in narrative form, of the cases submitted. The applicant shall also attach to the end of the postmarketing periodic report a completed FDA Form 3500A for all U.S. spontaneous reports of adverse drug experiences except those reported under paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) of this section, or those sent by FDA to the applicant. (G) Safety studies . This section shall contain an analysis and full critical discussion of all toxicological, clinical, and epidemiological studies containing important safety information. (H) Overall safety evaluation . This section shall contain a critical analysis and full discussion of the safety information provided in the periodic report as it pertains to serious unexpected reactions, increased frequencies of known toxicity, reactions listed in the manufacturer's core safety data sheet but not included in the U.S. label, drug interactions, overdose, drug abuse, experiences during pregnancy or lactation, chronic treatment, pediatric or geriatric treatment, and new safety issues. The applicant shall indicate when any significant information has not been obtained. The evaluation shall indicate whether the safety profile of the product remains consistent with cumulative experience to date and with the previous manufacturer's core safety data sheet. The evaluation shall specify any action recommended and the reasons for such recommendations. (I) Other information . This section shall include important information received after the data lock-point. (J) FDA Form 3500A . An FDA Form 3500A shall be used for each spontaneous U.S. adverse drug experience not reported under paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) of this section. (K) Location of adverse experience records . The current addresses where all adverse experience reports and records are maintained. (d) *␣*␣* (1) *␣*␣* The 15-day reporting requirements in paragraph (c)(1)(iii) of this section (i.e., a significant increase in frequency of a serious, expected adverse drug experience, or of a therapeutic failure) apply only to the reports found in scientific and medical journals either as case reports or as the result of a formal clinical trial. *␣*␣* * * * * * (f) Reporting FDA Form 3500A . (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (c)(1)(iii) and (f)(3) of this section, the applicant shall complete FDA Form 3500A for each report of an adverse drug experience. * * * * * (3) *␣*␣* (ii) The format is agreed to in advance by MedWatch: The FDA Medical Products Reporting Program. (4) Ten copies or fewer of FDA Form 3500A and/or a copy of the instructions for completing the form may be obtained from the Division of Epidemiology and Surveillance (HFD&hyph;730), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. More than 10 copies of the form may be obtained by writing to the Consolidated Forms and Publications Distribution Center, Washington Commerce Center, 3222 Hubbard Rd., Landover, MD 20785. * * * * * (j) *␣*␣* Copies of this guideline may be obtained from the CDER Executive Secretariat Staff (HFD&hyph;8), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 7500 Standish Pl., Rockville, MD 20857. * * * * * (l) *␣*␣* For purposes of this provision, the term ``applicant'' also includes any person reporting under paragraph (c)(1)(iv) of this section. * * * * * PART 600_BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS: GENERAL 16. The authority citation for 21 CFR part 600 continues to read as follows: Authority : Secs. 201, 501, 502, 503, 505, 510, 519, 701, 704 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 321, 351, 352, 353, 355, 360, 360i, 371, 374); secs. 215, 351, 352, 353, 361 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 216, 262, 263, 263a, 264). 17. Section 600.80 as added in a final rule published elsewhere in this issue of the Federal Register is amended in paragraph (a) by alphabetically adding definitions for ``Data lock-point,'' ``Disability,'' ``International birth date,'' and ``Life-threatening;'' by revising the definition of ``Serious;'' by adding two new sentences at the end of paragraph (b); by revising paragraph (c), the third sentence in paragraph (d)(1), paragraph (g), and the last sentence in paragraph (m); and by adding a new sentence at the end of paragraph (j) to read as follows: §600.80 Postmarketing reporting of adverse experiences. (a) *␣*␣* * * * * * Data lock-point means the date designated as the cutoff date for data to be incorporated into a specific postmarketing adverse experience periodic report. Data available to the licensed manufacturer after this date will not be incorporated into the report, unless it represents important information. Disability means a substantial disruption of a person's ability to carry out normal life functions. * * * * * International birth date means the date that the first regulatory authority in the world approved the biological drug product for marketing. Life-threatening means that the patient was, in the view of the initial reporter, at immediate risk of death from the adverse experience as it occurred. It does not include an adverse experience that, had it occurred in a more serious form, might have caused death. For example, product-induced hepatitis that resolved without evidence of hepatic failure would not be considered life-threatening even though hepatitis of a more severe nature can be fatal. Similarly, an allergic reaction resulting in angioedema of the face would not be life-threatening, even though angioedema of the larynx, allergic bronchospasm, or anaphylaxis can be fatal. Serious means an adverse drug experience occurring at any dose that is fatal or life-threatening, results in persistent or significant disability/incapacity, requires or prolongs inpatient hospitalization, necessitates medical or surgical intervention to preclude permanent impairment of a body function or permanent damage to a body structure, or is a congenital anomaly. * * * * * (b) *␣*␣* Licensed manufacturers should not resubmit to FDA adverse product experience reports forwarded to the licensed manufacturer by FDA; however, they should submit all followup information to FDA. Licensed manufacturers shall also develop written procedures for the surveillance, receipt, evaluation, and reporting of adverse experiences. (c) Reporting requirements . The licensed manufacturer shall report to FDA adverse experience information, as described in this section. The licensed manufacturer shall submit two copies of each report described in this section for nonvaccine biological products to the Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research (HFM&hyph;210), Food and Drug Administration, 1401 Rockville Pike, suite 200N, Rockville, MD 20852&hyph;1448. Submit all vaccine adverse experience reports to: Vaccine Adverse Event Reporting System (VAERS), P.O. Box 1100, Rockville, MD 20849&hyph;1100. FDA may waive the requirement for the second copy in appropriate instances. (1)(i) Postmarketing 15-day ``Alert reports'' . The licensed manufacturer shall report each adverse experience that is both serious and unexpected as soon as possible, but in any case within 15 calendar days of initial receipt of the information. These reports shall be submitted for nonvaccine biological products on FDA Form 3500A, and, for vaccines, on a VAERS form. (ii) Postmarketing 15-day ``Alert reports''_followup . The licensed manufacturer shall promptly investigate all adverse experiences that are the subject of these postmarketing 15-day Alert reports and shall submit followup reports within 15 calendar days of receipt of new information or as requested by FDA. If additional information is not obtainable, records should be maintained of the unsuccessful steps taken to seek additional information. These postmarketing 15-day Alert reports and followups to them shall be submitted under separate cover and may not be included, except for summary or tabular purposes, in a postmarketing adverse experience periodic report. (iii) Increased frequency report . The licensed manufacturer shall review periodically (at least as often as the periodic reporting cycle) the frequency of reports of adverse biological product experiences that are both serious and expected and reports of therapeutic failure (lack of effect), regardless of source, and report any significant increase in frequency as soon as possible but in any case within 15 calendar days of determining that a significant increase in frequency exists. Upon written notice, FDA may require that licensed manufacturers review the frequency of reports of serious, expected adverse biological experiences at intervals different than the periodic reporting cycle. Reports of a significant increase in frequency are required to be submitted in narrative form (including the time period on which the increased frequency is based, the method of analysis, and the interpretation of the results), rather than using the form designated by FDA. 15-day Alert reports based on increased frequency are required to be submitted under separate cover and may not be included, except for summary purposes, in a periodic report. (iv) Submission of reports . The requirements of paragraphs (c)(1)(i), (c)(1)(ii), and (c)(i)(iii) of this section, concerning the submission of postmarketing 15-day Alert reports, shall also apply to any person (other than the licensed manufacturer of the final product) whose name appears on the label of a licensed biological product as a manufacturer, packer, distributor, shared manufacturer, joint manufacturer, or any other participant involved in divided manufacturing. However, in order to avoid unnecessary duplication in the submission to FDA of reports required by paragraphs (c)(1)(i), (c)(1)(ii), and (c)(1)(iii) of this section, obligations of a manufacturer other than the licensed manufacturer, including a licensed manufacturer of the product other than in its final form, may be met by submission of all reports of serious adverse experiences to the licensed manufacturer of the final product. If a manufacturer, other than the licensed manufacturer, elects to submit reports to the licensed manufacturer rather than to FDA, it shall submit each report to the licensed manufacturer within 3 calendar days of its receipt, and the licensed manufacturer shall then comply with the requirements of this section. Under this circumstance, the manufacturer shall maintain a record of this action which shall include: (A) A copy of all adverse biological product experience reports submitted to the licensed manufacturer. (B) Date the report was received by the manufacturer other than the licensed manufacturer. (C) Date the report was submitted to the licensed manufacturer. (D) Name and address of the licensed manufacturer. (v) Report identification . Each report submitted under this paragraph shall bear prominent identification as to its contents, i.e., ``15-day Alert report,'' ``15-day Alert report_followup,'' or ``Increased frequency report.'' (2)(i) Periodic adverse experience reports . The licensed manufacturer shall report every 6 months each adverse experience not reported under paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) of this section. The periodic reporting term shall be based upon the international birth date of the biological product. The first 6-month anniversary of the international birth date after the application is approved in the United States is the data lock- point for the first periodic reporting term. Each subsequent 6-month anniversary of the international birth date is the data lock-point for subsequent periodic reporting terms for that particular product. Periodic reports shall be submitted to FDA within 45 days after the data lock-point. Upon written notice, FDA may require that the licensed manufacturer submit reports under this section at times other than those stated. A licensed manufacturer who wishes to submit periodic reports at different intervals must submit to FDA a request for a waiver under §600.90. Followup information to adverse experiences submitted in a periodic report may be submitted in the next periodic report. If the licensed manufacturer does not receive any adverse experience reports during the reporting period, the licensed manufacturer shall, in place of a periodic report, send a copy of the current approved U.S. labeling and a letter identifying the product, the application number, and the reporting period, stating that no adverse experience reports were received. (ii) Reports . Each periodic report shall contain: (A) Title page, table of contents, and introduction . The introduction shall be a summary of the periodic report with page references to detailed data and information. (B) Licensed manufacturer's core safety data sheet . The licensed manufacturer's core safety data sheet shall be a document prepared by the licensed manufacturer that contains all relevant safety information, including adverse experiences, which the licensed manufacturer believes should be listed for the licensed biological product in all countries where the licensed biological product is marketed. It may be used by the licensed manufacturer as the reference document by which an adverse experience is judged to be expected or unexpected for purposes of this postmarketing periodic report. For all other determinations of whether an adverse experience is expected or unexpected, the definition in paragraph (a) of this section shall apply. ( 1 ) FDA recognizes that the postmarketing periodic report may be submitted by the licensed manufacturer to multiple countries and the product may have different approved labels in the different countries. The use of the licensed manufacturer's core safety data sheet as the reference document for determining whether an adverse drug experience is unexpected or not may result in some overreporting of unexpected adverse events that actually are expected by the U.S. approved product label. This is because the approved label for the United States may have more safety information included in it than the licensed manufacturer's core safety data sheet. If an adverse event is not listed in the U.S. label, but is in the licensed manufacturer's core safety data sheet, this shall be clearly noted in the ``Overall safety evaluation'' (see paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(H) of this section). This section also shall highlight clearly any changes and the reasons for the changes in the licensed manufacturer's core safety data sheet since the previous postmarketing periodic report. ( 2 ) A licensed manufacturer may also use the approved U.S. label as the reference by which expected and unexpected adverse experiences are determined for the postmarketing periodic report. If a licensed manufacturer chooses to use the approved U.S. label for this purpose, it shall clearly be stated in this section of the report. (C) The product's marketing status . This section shall contain a table containing a chronological history of the marketing status of the product worldwide (all regulatory decisions affecting the product and all market launches) from the date it was first approved through its current status. Approvals or applications voluntarily withdrawn for safety reasons shall be included at a minimum. The product shall be listed by chemical (or proper name) and brand name(s). (D) Regulatory actions for safety reasons . This section shall contain a narrative identifying the reasons for significant regulatory authority or manufacturer-initiated actions taken anywhere in the world, or to be taken imminently, for safety reasons during the reporting period. This includes, for example, licensed application withdrawal or license suspension or failure to renew, distribution restrictions, clinical trial suspension, labeling changes due to significant safety concerns, dosage modifications, or pharmaceutical changes. (E) Patient exposure . This section shall include the product's domestic and foreign marketing distribution data during the reporting period. This shall be used to calculate the extent of patient exposure. The method used by the licensed manufacturer to estimate patient exposure shall always be described and shall include the total number of dosage units of each dosage form and strength or potency (e.g., 100,000/5-milligram tablets, 50,000/10-milliliter vials). (F) Individual case histories . This section shall consist of individual case reports of adverse experiences thought possibly associated with the use of the licensed biological product that are: ( 1 ) Serious, unexpected reports from published or unpublished clinical studies where the licensed manufacturer has concluded that there is a reasonable possibility that the licensed biological product caused the adverse experience; ( 2 ) Serious, expected or unexpected spontaneous adverse experience reports and nonserious, unexpected spontaneous adverse experience reports (causality always assumed in spontaneous reports) received directly by the licensed manufacturer from the initial reporter or received by the licensed manufacturer from a drug regulatory authority, both U.S. or foreign; and ( 3 ) Serious, expected or unexpected, individual published case histories and nonserious, unexpected individual published case histories. ( 4 ) All of these reports under paragraphs (c)(2)(ii)(F)(1) through (c)(2)(ii)(F)( 3 ) of this section shall be presented in line listing format with the following 10 columns: country, source, age, gender, dose, duration of treatment (prior to event), time to onset, description of reaction (as reported), outcome (e.g., fatal, resolved), other comments (e.g., manufacturer's report number). This format is consistent with that suggested by CIOMS. In addition, a tabular summary of the number of adverse events by body system may be included. This section shall end with an analysis by the reporter, in narrative form, of the cases submitted. The licensed manufacturer shall also attach to the end of the postmarketing periodic report a completed FDA Form 3500A or VAERS form for all U.S. spontaneous reports of adverse experiences except those reported under paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) of this section, or those sent by FDA to the licensed manufacturer. (G) Safety studies . This section shall contain an analysis and full critical discussion of all toxicological, clinical, and epidemiological studies containing important safety information. (H) Overall safety evaluation . This section shall contain a critical analysis and full discussion of the safety information provided in the periodic report as it pertains to serious unexpected reactions, increased frequencies of known toxicity, reactions listed in the manufacturer's core safety data sheet but not included in the U.S. label, licensed biological product interactions, overdose, licensed biological product abuse, experiences during pregnancy or lactation, chronic treatment, pediatric or geriatric treatment, and new safety issues. The licensed manufacturer shall indicate when any significant information has not been obtained. The evaluation shall indicate whether the safety profile of the product remains consistent with cumulative experience to date and with the previous licensed manufacturer's core safety data sheet. The evaluation shall specify any action recommended and the reasons for such recommendations. (I) Other information . This section shall include important information received after the data lock-point. (J) FDA Form 3500A or VAERS Form . An FDA Form 3500A or VAERS form (for vaccines)shall be used for each spontaneous U.S. adverse experience not reported under paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) of this section. (K) Location of adverse experience records . The current addresses where all adverse experience reports and records are maintained. (3) Distribution reports . The licensed manufacturer shall submit information about the quantity of the product distributed under the product license, including the quantity distributed to distributors. The interval between distribution reports shall be 6 months. The reporting term shall be based upon the international birth date of the biological product. The first 6-month anniversary of the international birth date after the application is approved in the United States is the data lock-point for the first reporting term. Each subsequent 6-month anniversary of the international birth date is the data lock-point for subsequent reporting terms for that particular product. Distribution reports shall be submitted to FDA within 45 calendar days after the data lock-point. Upon written notice, FDA may require that the licensed manufacturer submit distribution reports under this section at times other than every 6 months. The distribution report shall consist of the bulk lot number (from which the final container was filled), the fill lot numbers for the total number of dosage units of each strength or potency distributed (e.g., 50,000/10-milliliter vials), the label lot number (if different from fill lot number), labeled date of expiration, number of doses in fill lot/label lot, date of release of fill lot/label lot released for distribution at that time. If any significant amount of a fill lot/label lot is returned, include this information. Disclosure of financial or pricing data is not required. As needed, FDA may require submission of more detailed product distribution information. Upon written notice, FDA may require that the licensed manufacturer submit reports under this section at times other than those stated. A licensed manufacturer that wishes to submit reports at times other than those stated should submit a request for a waiver under §600.90. (d) *␣*␣* (1) *␣*␣* The 15-day reporting requirements in paragraph (c)(1)(iii) of this section (i.e., a significant increase in frequency of a serious, expected adverse experience or of a therapeutic failure) apply only to reports found in scientific and medical journals either as the results of formal clinical trial, or from epidemiologic studies or analyses of experience in a monitored series of patients. *␣*␣* * * * * * (g) Multiple reports . A licensed manufacturer should not include in reports under this section any adverse experience that occurred in clinical trials if they were previously submitted as part of the license application. If a report applies to a licensed biological product for which a licensed manufacturer holds more than one biological product license, the licensed manufacturer should submit the report for the license that was first approved. If a report refers to more than one biological product marketed by a licensed manufacturer, the licensed manufacturer should submit the report to the license for the product listed first in the report. * * * * * (j) *␣*␣* Copies of this guideline may be obtained from the Congressional and Consumer Affairs Branch (HFM&hyph;12), Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 1401 Rockville Pike, Rockville, MD 20852&hyph;1448. * * * * * (m) *␣*␣* For purposes of this provision, this paragraph also includes any person reporting under paragraph (c)(1)(iv) of this section. §600.81 [Removed] 18. Section 600.81␣ Distribution reports (as added in a final rule published elsewhere in this issue of the Federal Register ) is removed. Dated: October 13, 1994. William K. Hubbard, Interim Deputy Commissioner for Policy. [FR Doc. 94&hyph;26483 Filed 10&hyph;26&hyph;94; 8:45 am] BILLING CODE 4160&hyph;01&hyph;F
